Hawaii statutes.
§514B-22
Applicability to preexisting condominiums. Sections 514B‑4, 514B‑5, 514B-35, 514B-41(c), 514B‑46, 514B‑72, and part VI, and section 514B‑3 to the extent definitions are necessary in construing any of
those provisions, and all amendments thereto, apply to all condominiums created
in this State before July 1, 2006; provided that those sections:

(1) Shall apply
only with respect to events and circumstances occurring on or after
July 1, 2006; and

(2) Shall not
invalidate existing provisions of the declaration, bylaws, condominium map, or
other constituent documents of those condominiums if to do so would invalidate
the reserved rights of a developer or be an unreasonable impairment of
contract.

For
purposes of interpreting this chapter, the terms "condominium property
regime" and "horizontal property regime" shall be deemed to
correspond to the term "condominium"; the term "apartment"
shall be deemed to correspond to the term "unit"; the term "apartment
owner" shall be deemed to correspond to the term "unit owner";
and the term "association of apartment owners" shall be deemed to
correspond to the term "association". [L 2004, c 164, pt of §2; am L
2006, c 273, §5]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next